Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6847
Emergency services; facility, bill; limitation.

If a covered person receives emergency services at any health care facility, the facility shall not bill the covered person in excess of any deductible, copayment, or coinsurance amount applicable to in-network services pursuant to the covered person's health benefits plan.

Laws 2020, LB997, § 14.